Wyoming, session 2025, SF0030.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 21-16-2001 is created to read:

ARTICLE 20
WYOMING VETERAN LOAN REPAYMENT PROGRAM

SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
21-16-2001. Wyoming veteran loan repayment program;
eligibility criteria; procedures; reporting.

(a) The Wyoming veteran loan repayment program is
created to be administered by the University of Wyoming.

(b) To qualify for a loan under this section, the
applicant shall:

(i) Be a United States citizen or a permanent
resident alien who meets the definition of an eligible
noncitizen under federal Title IV requirements or
requirements of a subsequent similar federal enactment;

(ii) Be a veteran;

(iii) Be enrolled in good standing in a course
of study leading to a masters degree in social work or
counseling or a doctorate degree in psychology at the
University of Wyoming.

(c) Subject to the availability of funds appropriated
for this program, loans under this section may be granted
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
to qualified applicants to pay the cost of attendance for
the academic programs listed in paragraph (b)(iii) of this
section. For purposes of this subsection, "cost of
attendance" means the sum cost of tuition, mandatory fees,
room and board, books and supplies, travel and personal
expenses to attend the University of Wyoming as determined
annually by the University of Wyoming.

(d) Any federal, state or other grants or funding,
other than loans received by the applicant for the cost of
attendance for a qualifying academic program shall be
prioritized by the University of Wyoming and applied before
a loan provided under this section. A loan provided under
this section shall not exceed the cost of attendance for a
qualifying academic program, reduced by the amounts of any
federal, state or other grants or funding received by the
applicant.

(e) A recipient of a loan under this section may
repay the loan without monetary payment by working not less
than twenty-five percent (25%) of his working hours
providing mental health services within this state to
veterans. To qualify for repayment under this subsection,
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
work shall be performed within the minimum amount of time
necessary to repay the loan, plus three (3) years, which
shall begin with the calendar month following the month in
which the student completed the academic degree program.

(f) Any recipient of a loan under this section who
fails:

(i) To complete the academic program for which
the loan was provided shall commence monetary repayment of
the loan not later than forty-five (45) days after the
recipient leaves the academic program;

(ii) To obtain employment that provides mental
health services within this state to veterans within two
hundred forty (240) days after successfully completing the
academic program, shall commence monetary repayment of the
loan within two hundred eighty-five (285) days after
completion of the academic program.

(g) Loan repayment options under this section may be
deferred for a period not more than five (5) years while a
loan recipient is serving on full-time active duty in the
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
armed forces as defined by W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xxi), the army
national guard or the air national guard.

(h) The University of Wyoming shall have the powers
and duties to implement this section and shall establish
terms and conditions of loans issued under this section,
including:

(i) Interest rates and loan terms;

(ii) The form and process for loan application,
review and award;

(iii) Criteria under which students may be
relieved from having to repay loans and interest thereon,
in whole or in part, where the requirement to repay would
cause undue hardship;

(iv) Criteria for determining the cost of
attendance as used in establishing the loan amount for the
academic programs listed in paragraph (b)(iii) of this
section, based upon each semester or summer school session
of full or part-time program attendance.
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083

(j) Funding of the loan program established under
this section shall be by appropriation of the legislature.

(k) Repayment of loans and interest thereon shall be
credited to the school foundation program account.

(m) The University of Wyoming shall annually review
the loan program established under this section and report
to the governor and the legislature in accordance with W.S.
9-2-1014 regarding program results, funds received and
loans issued during the preceding academic year, together
with the status of all outstanding loan commitments and
repayments under the program.

(n) This program created by this section shall expire
effective June 30, 2035.

(o) As used in this section "veteran" means any
person who served in the United States armed forces as
defined by W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xxi), the army national guard or
air national guard and who was discharged or released under
conditions other than dishonorable.
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $

Section 2. 2024 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 118,
Section 2, Section 067 is amended to read:

Section 067. UNIVERSITY OF WYOMING
PROGRAM
State Aid 1., 2., 3., 4., 5.,
12., 13., 15. 401,227,647 401,227,647
School of Energy Res. 6.,
7., 8., 9. 23,857,808 19,000,000 S13 42,857,808
Tier 1 Engineering 18,584,703 18,584,703
NCAR MOU 1,528,316 1,528,316
Endowments & Matching 10., 11.,
12., 14. 39,500,000 39,500,000
TOTALS 484,698,474 0 19,000,000 503,698,474

AUTHORIZED EMPLOYEES
Full Time 0
Part Time 0
TOTAL 0

1. Of this general fund appropriation, three million dollars
($3,000,000.00) is to fund graduate assistantship stipends. This
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other
purpose.

2. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00) is for building artificial
intelligence expertise. Expenditure of this appropriation is
conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of
matching funds from any person. For purposes of this footnote, "person"
includes an individual, partnership, corporation, joint stock company
or any other association or entity, excluding all public entities. It
is the intent of the legislature that this appropriation not be
included in the University of Wyoming's standard budget for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

3. Of this general fund appropriation, one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) is to increase the library collections' biennial
budget. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose.

4. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, ten million dollars
($10,000,000.00) is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state
match for funds received by the University of Wyoming from athletic
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
booster organizations or persons donating funds to be used solely for
athletic programs. This appropriation shall:

(i) Be retained by the state treasurer for distribution in
accordance with the provisions of this footnote;

(ii) Be expended for the purposes of:

(A) Authorized recruitment of prospective student
athletes to the University of Wyoming and expenses associated with
participation in intercollegiate athletics including summer school
attendance, nutrition, tutoring, team travel and costs directly related
to participation in competition;

(B) Athletic training equipment.

(iii) Not be used for salaries or capital construction
projects;

(iv) To the extent funds are available, be matched on a
quarterly basis by the state treasurer for each cash or cash equivalent
contribution actually received by the University of Wyoming for the
purposes specified in this footnote for the period beginning July 1,
2024 and ending June 30, 2026 by distributing to the University of
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
Wyoming an amount equal to the amount of qualifying contributions for
the quarter.

(b) The appropriation specified in subsection (a) of this
footnote shall not be transferred or expended for any purpose not
specified in this footnote and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on
June 30, 2026.

5. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred thousand dollars
($200,000.00) is to support the University of Wyoming rodeo team.

6. Of this other funds appropriation, seventeen million dollars
($17,000,000.00)S13 is for demonstrations of coal solvent extraction
and a coal-derived asphalt road. This appropriation shall not be
transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the
legislature that this appropriation not be included in the University
of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal
biennium.

7. Of this other funds appropriation, two million dollars
($2,000,000.00)S13 is appropriated for the purpose of providing a state
match for funds received by the University of Wyoming or donated funds
to be used solely to support research, scholarships or endowments for
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
the school of energy resources. Distribution of this appropriation is
conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated other funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of
matching funds from any nonstate source. This appropriation shall be
retained by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with
W.S. 21-16-904. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended
for any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

8. Of this general fund appropriation, two million dollars
($2,000,000.00) is for building and continuing nuclear energy
scholarship, research and training capacity at the University of
Wyoming. This appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for
any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature that this
appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's standard
budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

9. Of this general fund appropriation, seven hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($750,000.00) is to administer, develop and implement an
incentive innovator competition related to lithium extraction,
development or use. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. It is the intent of the legislature
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
that this appropriation not be included in the University of Wyoming's
standard budget for the immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

10. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, twelve million dollars
($12,000,000.00) is appropriated to provide a state match for funds
received by the University of Wyoming or donated funds in accordance
with the following:

(i) Not less than ten million dollars ($10,000,000.00) is
conditioned upon a match for a permanent endowment under W.S. 21-16-901
through 21-16-904. All state matching distributions from the account
are appropriated solely to support endowments for priorities identified
and approved by the University of Wyoming board of trustees;

(ii) Up to two million dollars ($2,000,000.00) is
conditioned upon a match for purposes of expenditures for priorities
identified and approved by the University of Wyoming board of trustees.

(b) Distribution of the appropriation specified in subsection
(a) of this footnote is conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio
of one dollar ($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than
one dollar ($1.00) of matching funds from any nonstate source. This
appropriation shall be retained by the state treasurer for distribution
in accordance with W.S. 21‑16‑904 regardless of whether the match is for
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
purposes of a permanent endowment under paragraph (a)(i) of this
footnote or for expenditure by the University of Wyoming under
paragraph (a)(ii) of this footnote.

11. (a) Of this general fund appropriation, twenty-five million
dollars ($25,000,000.00) is appropriated to match research grants and
contracts related to flow through porous media. It is the intent of
the legislature that this appropriation not be included in the
University of Wyoming's standard budget for the immediately succeeding
fiscal biennium. This appropriation shall not be transferred or
expended for any other purpose. Of this general fund appropriation,
twelve million five hundred thousand dollars ($12,500,000.00) is
effective July 1, 2025, and twelve million five hundred thousand
dollars ($12,500,000.00) is effective April 1, 2026. Expenditure of
this appropriation is conditioned upon the University:

(i) Securing a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar
($1.00) of appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar
($1.00) of matching funds from any other source;

(ii) Conducting all computational and practical research
to the greatest extent reasonably possible with University of Wyoming
students within Wyoming;

SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
(iii) Performing research on geologic formations and
energy extraction opportunities that may be found within Wyoming;

(iv) To the extent possible, developing any feasibility
studies, small-scale experiments or large-scale projects associated
with research funded by this appropriation within Wyoming.

12. No funds from this appropriation shall be expended on the office
of diversity, equity and inclusion at the University of Wyoming.

13. A portion of this general fund appropriation may be expended to
conduct the purposes of this footnote. The University of Wyoming shall
review opportunities, feasibility and costs associated with expanding
medical education and training for Wyoming students, including broader
use of WICHE, expanded agreements with WWAMI and new relationships with
public universities in the western regional United States. The results
of the review and recommendations shall be reported to the joint
education interim committee and joint appropriations committee not
later than October 1, 2024.

14. Of this general fund appropriation, two million five hundred
thousand dollars ($2,500,000.00) is appropriated for the purpose of
providing a state match for funds received by the University of Wyoming
or donated funds to be used solely for support for excellence in
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083
GENERAL FEDERAL OTHER TOTAL
APPROPRIATION FUND FUNDS FUNDS APPROPRIATION
FOR $ $ $ $
research, education and extension in ranch and rangeland management,
agronomy and soil science. Distribution of this appropriation is
conditioned upon a match of funds in the ratio of one dollar ($1.00) of
appropriated general funds to not less than one dollar ($1.00) of
matching funds from any other source. This appropriation shall be
retained by the state treasurer for distribution in accordance with
W.S. 21‑16‑904. Notwithstanding W.S. 9-2-1008, 9-2-1012(e) and 9-4-207,
any unexpended, unobligated monies from this appropriation shall not
revert until June 30, 2030.

15. Of this general fund appropriation, two hundred fifty thousand
dollars ($250,000.00) shall be used for the Wyoming veteran loan
repayment program established under W.S. 21-16-2001. This appropriation
shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose. It is the
intent of the legislature that this appropriation be included in the
standard budget request for the University of Wyoming for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. Section 2 of this act shall be adjusted
and renumbered as necessary for any changes made to 2025
House Bill/Senate File 1 during the 2025 General Session as
enacted into law.
SF0030

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0083

Section 4. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0030